Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2929
Parenting plan; developed; approved by court; contents.

(1) In any proceeding in which parenting functions for a child are at issue under Chapter 42, a parenting plan shall be developed and shall be approved by the court. Court rule may provide for the parenting plan to be developed by the parties or their counsel, a court conciliation program, an approved mediation center, or a private mediator. When a parenting plan has not been developed and submitted to the court, the court shall create the parenting plan in accordance with the Parenting Act. A parenting plan shall serve the best interests of the child pursuant to sections 42-364 and 43-2923 or the Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act if such act applies and shall:

(a) Assist in developing a restructured family that serves the best interests of the child by accomplishing the parenting functions; and

(b) Include, but not be limited to, determinations of the following:

(i) Legal custody and physical custody of each child;

(ii) Apportionment of parenting time, visitation, or other access for each child, including, but not limited to, specified religious and secular holidays, birthdays, Mother's Day, Father's Day, school and family vacations, and other special occasions, specifying dates and times for the same, or a formula or method for determining such a schedule in sufficient detail that, if necessary, the schedule can be enforced in subsequent proceedings by the court, and set out appropriate times and numbers for telephone access;

(iii) Location of the child during the week, weekend, and given days during the year;

(iv) A transition plan, including the time and places for transfer of the child, method of communication or amount and type of contact between the parties during transfers, and duties related to transportation of the child during transfers;

(v) Procedures for making decisions regarding the day-to-day care and control of the child consistent with the major decisions made by the person or persons who have legal custody and responsibility for parenting functions;

(vi) Provisions for a remediation process regarding future modifications to such plan;

(vii) Arrangements to maximize the safety of all parties and the child;

(viii) Provisions to ensure regular and continuous school attendance and progress for school-age children of the parties; and

(ix) Provisions for safety when a preponderance of the evidence establishes child abuse or neglect, domestic intimate partner abuse, unresolved parental conflict, or criminal activity which is directly harmful to a child.

(2) A parenting plan shall require that the parties notify each other of a change of address, except that the address or return address shall only include the county and state for a party who is living or moving to an undisclosed location because of safety concerns.

(3) When safe and appropriate for the best interests of the child, the parenting plan may encourage mutual discussion of major decisions regarding parenting functions including the child's education, health care, and spiritual or religious upbringing. However, when a prior factual determination of child abuse or neglect, domestic intimate partner abuse, or unresolved parental conflict has been made, then consideration shall be given to inclusion of provisions for safety and a transition plan that restrict communication or the amount and type of contact between the parties during transfers.

(4) Regardless of the custody determinations in the parenting plan, unless parental rights are terminated, both parents shall continue to have the rights stated in section 42-381.

(5) In the development of a parenting plan, consideration shall be given to the child's age, the child's developmental needs, and the child's perspective, as well as consideration of enhancing healthy relationships between the child and each party.

Laws 2007, LB554, § 10;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 60;

Laws 2011, LB673, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB219, § 32.

Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act, see section 43-4601.

A determination of legal custody is a mandatory and indispensable part of a parenting plan. Vyhlidal v. Vyhlidal, 311 Neb. 495, 973 N.W.2d 171 (2022).

Pursuant to subdivision (1)(b)(ix) of this section, the district court did not abuse its discretion in ordering the mother to attend an anger management course and counseling to address her coparenting issues. Schriner v. Schriner, 25 Neb. App. 165, 903 N.W.2d 691 (2017).

Although the trial court's order did not attach a parenting plan and did not address several determinations under subdivision (1)(b) of this section, such error did not deprive the appellate court of jurisdiction where the order addressed custody, telephone visitation, and alternating weekend and holiday visitation. Citta v. Facka, 19 Neb. App. 736, 812 N.W.2d 917 (2012).

This section requires that a parenting plan be developed and approved by the court in any dissolution proceeding where the custody of a minor child is at issue. Where a decree fails to do so, the decree is not a final, appealable order. Bhuller v. Bhuller, 17 Neb. App. 607, 767 N.W.2d 813 (2009).